North Carolina statutes. Chapter 40. Eminent Domain. [Repealed]
§§ 40-1 through 40-53.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 919, s. 1.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see Chapter 40A,

G.S. 40A-1

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Section 40-7.1, relating to compensation for taking of water and sewer facilities by political subdivisions, was also repealed by Session Laws 1981, c. 627, effective upon ratification, June 19, 1981.